Washington statutes.
RCW 35.45.010

Authority to issue bonds.

The city or town council may provide by ordinance for the payment of the whole or any portion of the cost and expense of any local improvement by bonds of the improvement district, but no bonds shall be issued in excess of the cost and expense of the improvement, nor shall they be issued prior to twenty days after the thirty days allowed for the payment of assessments without penalty or interest.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.45.010. Prior: (i) 1911 c 98 s 46, part; 1899 c 124 s 1; RRS s 9399, part. (ii) 1917 c 139 s 1, part; 1915 c 168 s 4, part; 1911 c 98 s 47, part; 1899 c 124 s 2, part; RRS s 9400, part. (iii) 1911 c 98 s 50, part; RRS s 9403, part.]